Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1353, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 441, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1353), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1353. Purpose of article - Apportionment of revenues.
Req. No. 12852 Page 1


A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of the Oklahoma
Sales Tax Code to provide funds for the financing of the program
provided for by the Oklahoma Social Security Act and to provide
revenues for the support of the functions of the state government of
Oklahoma, and for this purpose it is hereby expressly provided that,
revenues derived pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Sales
Tax Code, subject to the apportionment requirements for the Oklahoma
Tax Commission and Office of Management and Enterprise Services
Joint Computer Enhancement Fund provided by Section 265 of this
title, and further subject to the apportionment requirement provided
in subsection D of this section, shall be apportioned as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the
following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be placed
to the credit of the General Revenue Fund to be paid out pursuant to
direct appropriation by the Legislature:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 86.04%
FY 2005 85.83%
FY 2006 85.54%
FY 2007 85.04%
FY 2008 through FY 2022 83.61%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 2025 83.36%
FY 2026 through FY 2027 83.23%
Req. No. 12852 Page 2

FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 83.61 83.48%;
2. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Education Reform Revolving Fund of
the State Department of Education:
a. for FY 2003, FY 2004 and FY 2005, ten and forty-two
one-hundredths percent (10.42%),
b. for FY 2006 through FY 2020, ten and forty-six one-
hundredths percent (10.46%),
c. for FY 2021:
(1) for the month beginning July 1, 2020, through the
month ending August 31, 2020, ten and forty-six
one-hundredths percent (10.46%), and
(2) for the month beginning September 1, 2020,
through the month ending June 30, 2021, eleven
and ninety-six one-hundredths percent (11.96%),
d. for FY 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten and
forty-six one-hundredths percent (10.46%);
3. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Teachers' Retirement System
Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 3.54%
FY 2005 3.75%
FY 2006 4.0%
Req. No. 12852 Page 3

FY 2007 4.5%
FY 2008 through FY 2020 5.0%
FY 2021:
a. for the month beginning July
1, 2020, through the month
ending August 31, 2020 5.0%
b. for the month beginning
September 1, 2020, through
the month ending June 30,
2021 3.5%
FY 2022 5.0%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 5.25%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 5.0%;
4. a. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022,
through June 30, 2025, and for each fiscal year
thereafter, eighty-seven one-hundredths percent
(0.87%) shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be
further apportioned as follows:
(1) twenty-four percent (24%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) in any fiscal year,
Req. No. 12852 Page 4

(2) forty-four percent (44%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed Nine Million Dollars
($9,000,000.00) in any fiscal year, and
(3) thirty-two percent (32%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Route 66 Commission
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed Six Million Six Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($6,600,000.00) in any fiscal
year, and
b. any amounts for fiscal years 2022 through 2025 which
exceed the limitations of subparagraph a of this
paragraph shall be placed to the credit of the General
Revenue Fund;, and
c. for fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years, one
percent (1.0%) shall be paid to the State Treasurer to
be further apportioned as follows:
(1) the first Six Million Six Hundred Thousand
Dollars ($6,600,000.00) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Route 66 Commission
Revolving Fund,
(2) of any remaining amounts:

Req. No. 12852 Page 5

(a) thirty-six percent (36%) shall be placed to
the credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, and
(b) sixty-four percent (64%) shall be placed to
the credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund; and
5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, and for
each fiscal year thereafter, six one-hundredths
percent (0.06%) shall be placed to the credit of the
Oklahoma Historical Society Capital Improvement and
Operations Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed the total amount apportioned
pursuant to this paragraph for the fiscal year ending
on June 30, 2015. Any amounts which exceed the
limitations of this paragraph shall be placed to the
credit of the General Revenue Fund.
B. Provided, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and
every fiscal year thereafter, an amount of revenue shall be
apportioned to each municipality or county which levies a sales tax
subject to the provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and
subsection F of Section 2701 of this title equal to the amount of
sales tax revenue of such municipality or county exempted by the
provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and subsection F of
Section 2701 of this title. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall
Req. No. 12852 Page 6

prom ulgate and adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of
this subsection.
C. From the monies that would otherwise be apportioned to the
General Revenue Fund pursuant to subsection A of this section, there
shall be apportioned the following amounts:
1. For the month ending August 31, 2019:
a. Nine Million Six Hundred Thousand Dollars
($9,600,000.00) to the credit of the State Highway
Construction and Maintenance Fund created in Section
1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
2. For the month ending September 30, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. For the month ending October 31, 2019:
Req. No. 12852 Page 7

a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
4. For the month ending November 30, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
5. For the month ending December 31, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
Req. No. 12852 Page 8

created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
D. For fiscal year 2029, and each subsequent fiscal year, Fifty
Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) shall be placed to the credit of
the Oklahoma Capital Assets Maintenance and Protection Fund created
in Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1403, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1403. A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of
Section 1401 et seq. of this title to provide for the support of the
functions of the state and local government of Oklahoma; and for
this purpose and to this end, it is hereby expressly provided that
the revenues derived hereunder, subject to the apportionment
provided in subsection B of this section and to the apportionment
requirements for the Oklahoma Tax Commission and Office of
Management and Enterprise Services Joint Computer Enhancement Fund
provided by Section 265 of this title, are hereby apportioned as
follows:
1. The following amounts shall be paid by the Tax Commission to
the State Treasurer and placed to the credit of the General Revenue
Fund to be paid out pursuant to direct appropriation by the
Legislature:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2004 85.35%
Req. No. 12852 Page 9

FY 2005 85.14%
FY 2006 85.54%
FY 2007 85.04%
FY 2008 through FY 2022 83.61%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 2025 83.36%
FY 2026 through FY 2027 83.23%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 83.61 83.48%;
2. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Education Reform Revolving Fund of
the State Department of Education:
a. for FY 2020, ten and forty-six one-hundredths percent
(10.46%),
b. for FY 2021:
(1) for the month beginning July 1, 2020, through the
month ending August 31, 2020, ten and forty-six
one-hundredths percent (10.46%), and
(2) for the month beginning September 1, 2020,
through the month ending June 30, 2021, eleven
and ninety-six one-hundredths percent (11.96%),
and
c. for FY 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten and
forty-six one-hundredths percent (10.46%);


Req. No. 12852 Page 10

3. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Teachers' Retirement System
Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 3.54%
FY 2005 3.75%
FY 2006 4.0%
FY 2007 4.5%
FY 2008 through FY 2020 5.0%
FY 2021:
a. for the month beginning July
1, 2020, through the month
ending August 31, 2020 5.0%
b. for the month beginning
September 1, 2020, through
the month ending June 30,
2021 3.5%
FY 2022 5.0%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 5.25%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 5.0%;
4. a. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015,
and for each fiscal year thereafter fiscal years 2016
through 2025, eighty-seven one-hundredths percent
Req. No. 12852 Page 11

(0.87%) shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be
further apportioned as follows:
(1) thirty-six percent (36%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed the total amount apportioned
pursuant to this division for the fiscal year
ending on June 30, 2015, and
(2) sixty-four percent (64%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed the total amount
apportioned pursuant to this division for the
fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015, and
b. any amounts for fiscal years 2022 through 2025 which
exceed the limitations of subparagraph a of this
paragraph shall be placed to the credit of the General
Revenue Fund;, and
c. for fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years, one
percent (1.0%) shall be paid to the State Treasurer to
be further apportioned as follows:
(1) thirty-six percent (36%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, and
Req. No. 12852 Page 12

(2) sixty-four percent (64%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund; and
5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, and for each
fiscal year thereafter, six one-hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be
placed to the credit of the Oklahoma Historical Society Capital
Improvement and Operations Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed the total amount apportioned pursuant to
this paragraph for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any
amounts which exceed the limitations of this paragraph shall be
placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
B. Prior to the apportionments otherwise provided in this
section, there shall be apportioned to the Education Reform
Revolving Fund of the State Department of Education the following
amounts in the following state fiscal years:
FY 2019 $19,600,000.00; and
FY 2020 and each year thereafter $20,500,000.00.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12852 MKS 02/21/25
Req. No. 12852 Page 13

























Req. No. 12852 Page 14